dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# baxe:
# tèma 2 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT)
# tèma 5 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT, then T2: à > é | (é > í) | (í > é))
# tèma 6 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT, then T2: é > ú)
# tèma 7 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT, then T2: í > é)
# -àr, -ér, -ír, -ír/is: skomenŧiando da 'l infenío
# '-er: skomenŧiando da 'l indikativo futuro de prima parsona singolar
SFX t0 Y 252
SFX t0 ar emo/J2 ar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 ar émoge/P1 ar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 ar émoi/I2 ar	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 ar è/J4I4 ar	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 ar é/J4I4 ar	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5, T12 + é
SFX t0 ar emo ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 ar è ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 ar é ar	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5, T12 + é([dg]e)
SFX t0 r va/J1 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 ar àvami/I1 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r a/J1 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 ar àami/I1 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r vo/J1 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 ar àvomi/I1 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 r o/J1 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 ar àomi/I1 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 ar àvimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 ar àimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 ar évimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo, T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | à > é
SFX t0 ar éimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo, T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | à > é
SFX t0 r vi/J3 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ar àvitu/j3I3 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r i/J3 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ar àitu/j3I3 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r vi/J4 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ar àvïu/I4 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r i/J4 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ar àiu/I4 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r se/J1 [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX t0 ar àsemi/I1 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX t0 ar àsimo ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX t0 ar àsemo ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + semo
SFX t0 ar ésemo ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T5 + semo, coxòto
SFX t0 r si/J3 [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si
SFX t0 ar àsitu/j3I3 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 r si/J4 [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si
SFX t0 ar àsïu/I4 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 ar esé/J4I4 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T5 + si, coxòto
SFX t0 r se [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third	# T2 + se
SFX t0 ar emo/V0 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 ar émoge/R1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 ar è/J4I4V0 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5, T12 + è
SFX t0 ar ège/R1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5, T12 + è
SFX t0 ar é/J4I4V0 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5, T12 + è
SFX t0 ar ége/R1 ar	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5, T12 + è
SFX t0 r nte ar	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX t0 ar ente ar	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte, T2: à > é
SFX t0 r sto/A1 [aei]r	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T2 + st[oiae]
SFX t0 r do/M0y0 [ai]r	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oi]
SFX t0 r da/F0y0 [ai]r	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+femenine	# T6 + d[ae]
SFX t0 r ndo/V0V2 ar	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 ar àndoge/P1 ar	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 r nde/V0V2 [aei]r	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX t0 ar àndege/P1 ar	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX t0 r nto/V0V2 [aei]r	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX t0 ar àntoge/P1 ar	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX t0 r mo/J2 er	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er imo/J2 er	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er émoge/P1 er	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er ímoge/P1 er	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er émoi/I2 er	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er ímoi/I2 er	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er é/J4I4 er	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 er í/J4I4 er	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 r mo er	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er imo er	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er é er	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 er í er	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 er évami/I1 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 er éami/I1 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 er évomi/I1 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 er éomi/I1 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 er évimo/J2I2 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 er éimo/J2I2 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 er ívimo/J2I2 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 er íimo/J2I2 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 er évitu/j3I3 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 er éitu/j3I3 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 er évïu/I4 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 er éiu/I4 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r va [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r a [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 er ésemi/I1 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX t0 er ésimo er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX t0 r semo er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T5 + semo, coxòto
SFX t0 er isi/J3 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si, padoan
SFX t0 er ésitu/j3I3 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 er ésïu/I4 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 r sé/J4I4 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si, coxòto
SFX t0 r mo/V0 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er émoge/R1 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er imo/V0 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er ímoge/R1 er	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 er è/J4I4V0 er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 er é/J4I4V0 er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 er í/J4I4V0 er	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 r nte er	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX t0 er ènte er	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX t0 er udo/M0y0 [^u]er	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oi]
SFX t0 er uda/F0y0 [^u]er	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+femenine	# T6 + d[ae]
SFX t0 uer ido/M0y0 uer	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oi]
SFX t0 uer ida/F0y0 uer	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+femenine	# T6 + d[ae]
SFX t0 r ndo/V0V2 [ei]r	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 er ando/V0V2 er	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 er éndoge/P1 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 er àndoge/P1 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 er ande/V0V2 er	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX t0 er éndege/P1 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX t0 er àndege/P1 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX t0 er éntoge/P1 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX t0 er èntoge/P1 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + nto
SFX t0 rò mo/J2 erò	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò imo/J2 erò	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò émoge/P1 erò	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò ímoge/P1 erò	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò émoi/I2 erò	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò ímoi/I2 erò	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò é/J4I4 erò	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 erò í/J4I4 erò	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 rò mo erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò imo erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX t0 erò é erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 erò í erò	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX t0 rò va/J1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 erò évami/I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 rò a/J1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 erò éami/I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 rò vo/J1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 erò évomi/I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 rò o/J1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 erò éomi/I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 erò évimo/J2I2 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 erò éimo/J2I2 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 erò ívimo/J2I2 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 erò íimo/J2I2 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 rò vi/J3 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò i/j3J3 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 erò évitu/j3I3 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 erò éitu/j3I3 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò vi/J4 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò i/J4 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 erò évïu/I4 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 erò éiu/I4 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò va erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 rò a erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
